Utah statutes.
10-3-717.   Purpose of resolutions.

Unless otherwise required by law, the governing body may exercise all administrative powers by resolution including: (1) establishing water and sewer rates; (2) charges for garbage collection and fees charged for municipal services; (3) establishing personnel policies and guidelines; and (4) regulating the use and operation of municipal property.  Punishment, fines or forfeitures may not be imposed by resolution.

